Utah statutes.
26-6-29.   Violation -- Penalty.
(1)  Any individual or entity entitled to receive confidential information
from the Department of Health or a local health department under this chapter,
other than the individual identified in that information, who violates this
chapter by releasing or making public confidential information, or by
otherwise breaching the confidentiality requirements of this chapter, is
guilty of a class B misdemeanor.
(2)  This chapter does not apply to any individual or entity that holds or
receives information relating to an individual who has or is suspected of
having a disease designated by the department as a communicable or reportable
disease under this chapter, if that individual or entity has obtained the
information from a source other than the department or a local health
department.
